Maryland, session 2025, HB1521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1521*

HOUSE BILL 1521
19–201.
There is a State Board of Social Work Examiners in the Department.
19–202.
(a) (1) The Board consists of [12] 14 members.
(2) Of the [12] 14 Board members:
(i) 10 shall be licensed social workers of whom:
1. Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, 1 is a licensed
bachelor social worker;
2. Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, 1 is a licensed
master social worker at the time of appointment;
3. Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, at least 1 is:
A. A licensed certified social worker; or
B. A licensed master social worker who is approved for
independent practice;
4. Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, at least 4 are
licensed certified social workers–clinical;
5. 1 is a licensed social worker employed by the Department
of Human Services; and
6. Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, 1 is a licensed
social worker who is:
A. Primarily engaged in social worker education at a social
work program accredited by the Council on Social Work Education; and
B. Nominated from a list of names submitted by the deans
and directors of the Maryland Social Work Education Programs; and
(ii) [2] 4 shall be consumer members.
19–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, an individual shall be:

HOUSE BILL 1521 3
(1) Licensed by the Board before the individual may practice social work in
this State while representing oneself as a social worker; or
(2) Licensed as a certified social worker–clinical before the individual may
practice clinical social work in this State.
19–302.
(a) To obtain a license, an applicant shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the
Board that the applicant:
(1) Has submitted a complete written application in the form prescribed by
the Board;
(2) Is at least 18 years old;
(3) Is of good moral character;
[(4) Except as otherwise provided in this title, has successfully passed an
examination or examinations prescribed by the Board pertinent to the license sought;]
[(5)] (4) Has paid all applicable fees specified by the Board;
[(6)] (5) Has completed a criminal history records check in accordance
with § 19–302.2 of this subtitle at the applicant’s expense; and
[(7)] (6) Has submitted to an examination if required under § 19–302.3 of
this subtitle.
(b) To obtain a bachelor social worker license, an applicant shall:
(1) Meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section; and
(2) Have received a baccalaureate degree in social work from a program
that is accredited or is a candidate for accreditation by the Council on Social Work
Education or an equivalent organization approved by the Council on Social Work
Education.
(c) To obtain a master social worker license, an applicant shall:
(1) Meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section; and
(2) Have received a master’s degree from a program that is accredited or is
a candidate for accreditation by the Council on Social Work Education or an equivalent
organization approved by the Council on Social Work Education.

HOUSE BILL 1521
(d) Except as provided in § 19–302.1 of this subtitle, to obtain a certified social
worker license, on or before December 31, 2023, an applicant shall:
(1) Meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section;
(2) Have received a master’s degree from a program accredited by the
Council on Social Work Education or an equivalent organization approved by the Council
on Social Work Education; [and]
(3) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS TITLE, HAVE
SUCCESSFULLY PASSED AN EXAMINATION OR EXAMINATIONS PRESCRIBED BY THE
BOARD PERTINENT TO THE LICENSE SOUGHT; AND
[(3)] (4) Provide in a form prescribed by the Board, documentation of
having completed 2 years as a licensee with supervised experience of at least 3,000 hours
after receiving the master’s degree with a minimum of 100 hours of periodic face–to–face
supervision in the practice of social work under the terms and conditions that the Board
determines by regulation.
(e) Except as provided in § 19–302.1 of this subtitle, to obtain a certified social
worker–clinical license, an applicant shall:
(1) Meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section;
(2) Have received a master’s degree in social work and documentation of
completion of 12 academic credits in clinical course work from a program accredited by the
Council on Social Work Education or an equivalent organization approved by the Council
on Social Work Education, with a minimum of 6 of the 12 academic credits obtained in a
master’s degree program; [and]
(3) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS TITLE, HAVE
SUCCESSFULLY PASSED AN EXAMINATION OR EXAMINATIONS PRESCRIBED BY THE
BOARD PERTINENT TO THE LICENSE SOUGHT; AND
[(3)] (4) Provide in a form prescribed by the Board, documentation of
having completed 2 years as a licensee with supervised experience of at least 3,000 hours,
of which 1,500 hours are in face–to–face client contact, after receiving the master’s degree
with a minimum of 100 hours of periodic face–to–face supervision in the assessment,
formulation of a diagnostic impression, and treatment of behavioral health disorders and
other conditions and the provision of psychotherapy under the terms and conditions that
the Board determines by regulation.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.